test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - hirða: # 
    hirða+V+Inf: hirða
    hirða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hirðir
    hirða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hirdi
    hirða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hirdu
    hirða+V+Sup: hirt
    hirða+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hirdur
